Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF739.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.50, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Requirements; exception. (a) Every motor vehicle and every vehicle that is being drawn at the end of a train of vehicles must be equipped with at least one tail lamp, exhibiting a red light plainly visible from a distance of 500 feet to the rear. (b) Every motor vehicle, other than a truck-tractor, and every vehicle that is being drawn at the end of a train of vehicles, registered in this state and manufactured or assembled after January 1, 1960, must be equipped with at least two tail lamps mounted on the rear and on the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable. When lighted, the tail lamps must comply with the provisions of this section. (c) An implement of husbandry being towed by a motor vehicle at a speed of not more than deleted text begin 30deleted text end new text begin 35new text end miles per hour, displaying a slow-moving vehicle emblem, and complying with section 169.55, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (4), is not subject to the requirements of this section. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.522, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Displaying emblem; rules. (a) All animal-drawn vehicles, motorized golf carts when operated on designated roadways pursuant to section 169.045, implements of husbandry, and other machinery, including all road construction machinery, which are designed for operation at a speed of deleted text begin 30deleted text end new text begin 35new text end miles per hour or less, must display a triangular slow-moving vehicle emblem, except (1) when being used in actual construction and maintenance work and traveling within the limits of a construction area marked in accordance with the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, as set forth in section 169.06, or (2) for a towed implement of husbandry that is empty and that is not self-propelled, in which case it may be towed at lawful speeds greater than deleted text begin 30deleted text end new text begin 35new text end miles per hour without removing the slow-moving vehicle emblem. The emblem must consist of a fluorescent or illuminated red-orange triangle with a dark red reflective border and be mounted so as to be visible from a distance of not less than 600 feet to the rear. When a primary power unit towing an implement of husbandry or other machinery displays a slow-moving vehicle emblem visible from a distance of 600 feet to the rear, it is not necessary to display a similar emblem on the secondary unit. All slow-moving vehicle emblems sold in this state must be so designed that when properly mounted they are visible from a distance of not less than 600 feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful lower beam of headlamps on a motor vehicle. The commissioner of public safety shall adopt standards and specifications for the design and position of mounting the slow-moving vehicle emblem. Such standards and specifications must be adopted by rule in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. (b) An alternate slow-moving vehicle emblem consisting of a dull black triangle with a white reflective border may be used after obtaining a permit from the commissioner under rules of the commissioner. A person with a permit to use an alternate slow-moving vehicle emblem must: (1) carry in the vehicle a regular slow-moving vehicle emblem and display the emblem when operating a vehicle between sunset and sunrise, and at any other time when visibility is impaired by weather, smoke, fog, or other conditions; and (2) permanently affix to the rear of the slow-moving vehicle at least 72 square inches of reflective tape that reflects the color red. (c) In addition to the emblem requirement under this subdivision, an animal-drawn vehicle must comply with section 169.58, subdivision 6. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.801, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Speed. No person may operate or tow an implement of husbandry at a speed of more than deleted text begin 30deleted text end new text begin 35new text end miles per hour. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.81, subdivision 5b, is amended to read: Subd. 5b. Securing load; exceptions. (a) The driver of a vehicle transporting sand, gravel, aggregate, dirt, lime rock, silica, or similar material shall ensure that the cargo compartment of the vehicle is securely covered if: (1) the vertical distance from the top of an exterior wall of the cargo compartment to the load, when measured downward along the inside surface of the wall, is less than six inches; or (2) the horizontal distance from the top of an exterior wall of the cargo compartment to the load is less than two feet. (b) The driver shall not operate a vehicle to transport sand, gravel, aggregate, dirt, lime rock, silica, or similar material in or on any part of the vehicle other than in the cargo container. The driver shall clean the vehicle of loose sand, gravel, aggregate, dirt, lime rock, silica, or similar material before the vehicle is moved on a road, street, or highway following loading or unloading. (c) A driver of a vehicle used to transport garbage, rubbish, trash, debris, or similar material is not required to cover the transported material as long as (1) the vehicle is being operated at a speed less than deleted text begin 30deleted text end new text begin 35new text end miles per hour, (2) the vehicle is not being operated on an interstate highway, and (3) no part of the load escapes from the vehicle. A driver shall immediately retrieve material that escapes from the vehicle, when safe to do so.